Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.98.015

Continuation of existing law.

The provisions of this title, insofar as they are substantially the same as statutory provisions repealed by chapter 37, Laws of 2014 and relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations, and not as new enactments.

[ 2014 c 37 s 258.]